California, session 20252026, AB1306.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 44253.45 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 44253.4, to read:44253.45. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission may approve a teacher education program offered by a school district or county office of education administered for purposes of earning a cross-cultural language and academic development certificate, English learner authorization, or a bilingual authorization certificate, including a California Teacher of English Learners program.(b) The commission shall apply the standards for approval of a program of professional preparation offered by a regionally accredited institution of higher education to a program of professional preparation offered by a school district or county office of education under this section.